ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 곡물/쌀/시리얼 > 오트/그리츠/조리된 시리얼: 콘밀 및 폴렌타; 인스턴트 및 퀵 오츠; 뮤즐리; 귀리 가루 및 파우더; 오트밀 포리지; 롤드 오츠; 스틸 컷 오츠
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Korn, ris og morgenmadsprodukter > Havre, gryn og varme morgenmadsprodukter: Majsmel og polenta; Letkogte havregryn; Müsli; Havremel og -pulver; Grød; Havregryn; Skårne havregryn
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Granos, arroz y cereales > Avenas, sémolas y harina de avenas: Harina de maíz y polenta; Avena instantánea y rápida; Muesli; Harina y polvo de avena; Avena cocida; Avena en hojuelas; Avena cortada al acero
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > เมล็ดพืช ข้าว และธัญพืช > ข้าวโอ๊ต ปลายข้าว และซีเรียลแบบร้อน: แป้งข้าวโพดป่นและโพเลนตา; ข้าวโอ๊ตกึ่งสำเร็จรูป; มูสลี; แป้งโอ๊ตและข้าวโอ๊ตผง; พอร์ริดจ์; ข้าวโอ๊ตแบบแผ่น; ข้าวโอ๊ตแบบหัก
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Žitarice u zrnu, riža i žitarice > Zob, griz i vruće žitarice: Kukuruzno brašno i palenta; Instant i brze zobene pahuljice; Müsli; Zobeno brašno i prah; Kaša; Zobene pahuljice; Sjeckana zob
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Ziarna, ryż i płatki > Płatki owsiane, kasza kukurydziana i płatki śniadaniowe na ciepło: Mąka kukurydziana i polenta; Płatki owsiane błyskawiczne; Musli; Mąka i proszek owsiany; Owsianka; Płatki owsiane górskie; Płatki owsiane cięte
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Cereale și orez > Ovăz, crupe și cereale preparate la cald: Mălai și mămăligă; Fulgi de ovăz instant; Muesli; Făină și pudră din ovăz; Terci; Fulgi de ovăz; Ovăz tăiat
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Δημητριακά, ρύζι & δημητριακά πρωινού > Βρώμη, χοντροαλεσμένη βρώμη & ζεστά δημητριακά: Καλαμποκάλευρο και πολέντα; Στιγμιαία και γρήγορη βρώμη; Μούσλι; Αλεύρι και σκόνη βρώμης; Χυλός βρώμης; Νιφάδες βρώμης; Κομμένη βρώμη
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 粮食 > 燕麦/粗玉米粉/热麦片粥: 玉米粉和波伦塔; 即食和快熟燕麦片; 什锦麦片; 燕麦粉; 粥; 燕麦片; 钢切燕麦片
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Viljat, riisi ja jyvät > Kaurahiutaleet, -ryynit ja puuro: Maissijauhot ja polenta; Pikakaurahiutaleet; Mysli; Kaurajauhot; Puuro; Kaurahiutaleet; Leikatut kaurasuurimot
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Körner, Reis & Getreide > Haferflocken, Grütze & Grieß: Maismehl & Polenta; Instant-Haferflocken; Müsli; Hafermehl & -pulver; Haferbrei; Haferflocken; Hafergrütze
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Granen, rijst en graanproducten > Haver, gort en havermout: Maïsmeel en polenta; Instant en snelkokende haver; Muesli; Havermeel en -poeder; Pap; Havervlokken; Gesneden haver
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Grūdai, ryžiai ir dribsniai > Avižos, kruopos ir verdami dribsniai: Kukurūzų miltai ir polenta; Greitai paruošiamos avižos; Miusli; Avižiniai miltai ir milteliai; Košė; Avižiniai dribsniai; Grūstos avižos
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Zrna, riž in žita > Oves, zdrob in žitni kosmiči: Koruzna moka in polenta; Instantni in hitri ovseni kosmiči; Muesli; Ovsena moka in prah; Ovsena kaša; Valjani ovseni kosmiči; Jekleno rezani oves
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Grãos, arroz e cereal > Aveias, papas de milho e cereais quentes: Farinha de milho e polenta; Aveia instantânea e de cozedura rápida; Muesli; Farinha e pó de aveia; Papas de aveia; Flocos de aveia; Aveia cortada
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Korn, ris og frokostblandinger > Havre, korn og varme frokostblandinger: Maismel og polenta; Lettkokte havregryn; Müsli; Havremel og -pulver; Grøt; Havregryn; Steel cut-havre
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Säd, ris och spannmål > Havregryn, krossgryn och varma frukostflingor: Majsmjöl & polenta; Snabblagade havregryn; Müsli; Havremjöl & havrepulver; Gröt; Havregryn; Klippt havre
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Gabona, rizs és gabonafélék > Zab, dara és forró gabona: Kukoricadarák és polenták; Instant és gyors főzésű zabpelyhek; Müzli; Zablisztek és -porok; Zabkása; Zabpelyhek; Vágott zabok
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Рис и крупы > Овсяная, кукурузная и манная крупы: Кукурузная крупа и полента; Овсянка быстрого приготовления; Мюсли; Овсяная мука и порошок; Каша; Овсяные хлопья; Дробленая овсянка
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 五穀雜糧食品 > 即食燕麥粥: 玉米粉與玉米糊; 即食與快煮燕麥; 什錦穀片; 燕麥粉; 粥品; 傳統燕麥片; 鋼切燕麥
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Thóc lúa, gạo và ngũ cốc > Yến mạch, bột yến mạch thô và ngũ cốc nấu: Bột ngô & polenta; Yến mạch ăn liền & nấu nhanh; Ngũ cốc muesli; Bột yến mạch; Cháo; Yến mạch cán dẹt; Yến mạch cắt nhỏ
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Obilniny, ryža a cereálie > Ovos, krúpy a pražené cereálie: Kukuričná múka a polenta; Instantné a rýchle ovsené vločky; Müsli; Ovsená múka a prášok; Kaša; Ovsené vločky; Granule z ovsených vločiek
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Graines, riz et céréales > Flocons d’avoine, gruau et farine d’avoine: Semoule de maïs et polenta; Flocons d’avoine instantanés et à cuisson rapide; Muesli; Farine et poudre d’avoine; Porridge; Flocons d’avoine; Avoine concassée
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 米・穀類 > オートミール・グリッツ: コーンミール・ポレンタ; インスタント・クイックオーツ; ミューズリー; オーツ麦粉・パウダー; ポリッジ; ロールドオーツ; スティールカットオーツ
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Зърна, ориз и зърнени храни > Овесени ядки, зърнени храни и топли зърнена храни: Царевично брашно и полента; Разтворими и бързи овесени ядки; Мюсли; Овесено брашно и прах; Каша; Овесени ядки; Нарязани овесени ядки
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Obilniny, rýže a obiloviny > Oves, otruby a ovesné vločky: Kukuřičná mouka a polenta; Instantní ovesné vločky; Müsli; Ovesná mouka a prášek; Kaše; Ovesné vločky; Řezaný oves
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Grãos, arroz e cereais > Aveias, grãos e farinha de aveia: Fubá e polenta; Aveia instantânea e de cozimento rápido; Muesli; Farinha e pó de aveia; Aveia; Aveia em flocos; Aveia em grãos cortados
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Tahıllar ve Pirinç > Yulaflar, Kırma Hububatlar ve Lapalar: Mısır unu ve polenta; Hızlı pişen yulaf; Müsli; Yulaf unu ve tozu; Yulaf Lapası; Yulaf ezmesi; Kesilmiş yulaf
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Grains, Rice & Cereal > Oats, Grits & Hot Cereal: Cornmeal & Polenta; Instant & Quick Oats; Muesli; Oat Flour & Powder; Porridge; Rolled Oats; Steel Cut Oats
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Grano, riso e cereali > Fiocchi d'avena e crusca: Farina di mais e polenta; Avena istantanea e a cottura rapida; Muesli; Farina e polvere d’avena; Porridge; Fiocchi d’avena; Avena spezzata